Utah statutes.
7-1-320.   Actions to enjoin violations -- Bond not required -- Recovery -- Attorney's fees.

(1)  Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of this title or any rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner or the department, he may bring an action in an appropriate court of general jurisdiction to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this title or any rule or order issued under this title. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or extraordinary writ shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets. The court may not require the commissioner to post a bond.

(2)  If the court finds that the defendant in an action brought by the commissioner pursuant to this section has violated or is about to violate any provision of this title or any rule or order of the commissioner, the court may award to the department an amount not exceeding $10,000 per day for each day the defendant was in violation.  The court may also award the department reasonable attorney's fees.

